Ohio, session 136, HB178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5101.546 of the Revised Code be 6
enacted to read as follows: 7
Sec. 5101.546. (A) The department of job and family 8
services shall provide a supplemental benefit allotment to 9
households participating in the supplemental nutrition 10
assistance program in accordance with this section. 11
(B) To be eligible to receive a supplemental benefit 12
allotment under this section, a participating household shall 13
meet both of the following requirements: 14
(1) Include an individual who is sixty years of age or 15
older; 16

H. B. No. 178 Page 2
As Introduced
(2) Receive a monthly supplemental nutrition assistance 17
program benefit allotment that is less than fifty dollars. 18
(C) The department shall provide eligible households with 19
a supplemental benefit allotment in an amount that equals the 20
amount necessary to provide the household with a total monthly 21
benefit amount of fifty dollars. 22
Section 2. All items in this act are hereby appropriated 23
as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the 24
credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations 25
made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 26
2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. 27
The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to 28
any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. 29
Section 3. 30
31
1 2 3 4 5
A JFS DEPARTMENT OF JOB AND FAMILY SERVICES
B General Revenue Fund
C GRF 600564 SNAP State Supplement $12,495,000 $21,415,000
D TOTAL GRF General Revenue Fund $12,495,000 $21,415,000
E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $12,495,000 $21,415,000
SNAP STATE SUPPLEMENTAL 32
The foregoing appropriation item 600564, SNAP State 33
Supplement, shall be used to provide a supplemental benefit 34
allotment for eligible households participating in the 35

H. B. No. 178 Page 3
As Introduced
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program in accordance with 36
section 5101.546 of the Revised Code. 37
Section 4. Within the limits set forth in this act, the 38
Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts 39
indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation 40
made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which 41
appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from 42
operating appropriations contained in this act shall be 43
accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all 44
applicable provisions of, the main operating appropriations act 45
of the 136th General Assembly. 46